Hawaii statutes.
§321‑473 Access to information.
(a) Upon request of the director or a domestic violence fatality review team,
all medical examiners, physicians acting under the direction of a coroner,
providers of medical care, state agencies, and county agencies shall disclose
to the department and the domestic violence fatality review team all
information and records regarding the circumstances of a victim's death so that
the department may conduct a multidisciplinary and multiagency review of
domestic violence fatalities pursuant to this part.

(b) Members of the domestic violence fatality
review team shall develop procedures related to near-deaths resulting from
intimate partner violence.

(c) The department may enter into memoranda of
understanding with the relevant state agencies and branches of government and
county agencies to obtain information relating to near-deaths resulting from
intimate partner violence.

(d) To the extent that this section conflicts
with other state confidentiality laws, the provisions of this section shall
require disclosure, notwithstanding the existence of a specific confidentiality
statute.

(e) An entity represented on a domestic
violence fatality review team and any entity cooperating with an entity
represented on a domestic violence fatality review team may share with other
members of the team:

(1) Information in its possession concerning the
victim;

(2) Information in its possession concerning any
person who was in contact with the victim; and

(3) Any other information in its possession deemed by
the entity to be pertinent to the domestic violence fatality review.

(f) Any information shared by an entity with
other members of a domestic violence fatality review team is subject to the
same restrictions on disclosure of the information or the records as the
originating entity.

(g) To the extent possible, the review
conducted pursuant to section 321-472 shall commence no later than one year
following the death, near-death, or suicide. [L 2006, c 82, pt of §1; am L
2015, c 203, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next